Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202628-1354
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Public Protection Act:

(1) Enterprise means any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, trust, association, or any legal entity, union, or group of individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity, and shall include illicit as well as licit enterprises as well as other entities;

(2) Pattern of racketeering activity means a cumulative loss for one or more victims or gains for the enterprise of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars resulting from at least two acts of racketeering activity, one of which occurred after August 30, 2009, and the last of which occurred within ten years, excluding any period of imprisonment, after the commission of a prior act of racketeering activity;

(3) Until January 1, 2017, person means any individual or entity, as defined in section 21-2014, holding or capable of holding a legal, equitable, or beneficial interest in property. Beginning January 1, 2017, person means any individual or entity, as defined in section 21-214, holding or capable of holding a legal, equitable, or beneficial interest in property;

(4) Prosecutor includes the Attorney General of the State of Nebraska, the deputy attorney general, assistant attorneys general, a county attorney, a deputy county attorney, or any person so designated by the Attorney General, a county attorney, or a court of the state to carry out the powers conferred by the act;

(5) Racketeering activity includes the commission of, criminal attempt to commit, conspiracy to commit, aiding and abetting in the commission of, aiding in the consummation of, acting as an accessory to the commission of, or the solicitation, coercion, or intimidation of another to commit or aid in the commission of any of the following:

(a) Offenses against the person which include: Murder in the first degree under section 28-303; murder in the second degree under section 28-304; manslaughter under section 28-305; assault in the first degree under section 28-308; assault in the second degree under section 28-309; assault in the third degree under section 28-310; terroristic threats under section 28-311.01; kidnapping under section 28-313; false imprisonment in the first degree under section 28-314; false imprisonment in the second degree under section 28-315; sexual assault in the first degree under section 28-319; and robbery under section 28-324;

(b) Offenses relating to controlled substances which include: To unlawfully manufacture, distribute, deliver, dispense, or possess with intent to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a controlled substance under subsection (1) of section 28-416; possession of marijuana weighing more than one pound under subsection (13) of section 28-416; possession of money used or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of subsection (1) of section 28-416 prohibited under subsection (18) of section 28-416; any violation of section 28-418; to unlawfully manufacture, distribute, deliver, or possess with intent to distribute or deliver an imitation controlled substance under section 28-445; possession of anhydrous ammonia with the intent to manufacture methamphetamine under section 28-451; and possession of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine with the intent to manufacture methamphetamine under section 28-452;

(c) Offenses against property which include: Arson in the first degree under section 28-502; arson in the second degree under section 28-503; arson in the third degree under section 28-504; burglary under section 28-507; theft by unlawful taking or disposition under section 28-511; theft by shoplifting under section 28-511.01; theft by deception under section 28-512; theft by extortion under section 28-513; theft of services under section 28-515; theft by receiving stolen property under section 28-517; criminal mischief under section 28-519; and unlawfully depriving or obtaining property or services using a computer under section 28-1344;

(d) Offenses involving fraud which include: Burning to defraud an insurer under section 28-505; forgery in the first degree under section 28-602; forgery in the second degree under section 28-603; criminal possession of a forged instrument under section 28-604; criminal possession of written instrument forgery devices under section 28-605; criminal impersonation under section 28-638; identity theft under section 28-639; identity fraud under section 28-640; false statement or book entry under section 28-612; tampering with a publicly exhibited contest under section 28-614; issuing a false financial statement for purposes of obtaining a financial transaction device under section 28-619; unauthorized use of a financial transaction device under section 28-620; criminal possession of a financial transaction device under section 28-621; unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the first degree under section 28-622; unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the second degree under section 28-623; criminal possession of a blank financial transaction device under section 28-624; criminal sale of a blank financial transaction device under section 28-625; criminal possession of a financial transaction forgery device under section 28-626; unlawful manufacture of a financial transaction device under section 28-627; laundering of sales forms under section 28-628; unlawful acquisition of sales form processing services under section 28-629; unlawful factoring of a financial transaction device under section 28-630; and fraudulent insurance acts under section 28-631;

(e) Offenses involving governmental operations which include: Abuse of public records under section 28-911; perjury or subornation of perjury under section 28-915; bribery under section 28-917; bribery of a witness under section 28-918; tampering with a witness or informant or jury tampering under section 28-919; bribery of a juror under section 28-920; assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the first degree under section 28-929; assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the second degree under section 28-930; assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the third degree under section 28-931; and assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle under section 28-931.01;

(f) Offenses involving gambling which include: Promoting gambling in the first degree under section 28-1102; possession of gambling records under section 28-1105; gambling debt collection under section 28-1105.01; and possession of a gambling device under section 28-1107;

(g) Offenses relating to firearms, weapons, and explosives which include: Carrying a concealed weapon under section 28-1202; transportation or possession of machine guns, short rifles, or short shotguns under section 28-1203; unlawful possession of a handgun under section 28-1204; unlawful transfer of a firearm to a juvenile under section 28-1204.01; possession of a firearm by a prohibited juvenile offender under section 28-1204.05; using a deadly weapon to commit a felony, possession of a deadly weapon during the commission of a felony, or carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission of a dangerous misdemeanor under section 28-1205; possession of a deadly weapon by a prohibited person under section 28-1206; possession of a defaced firearm under section 28-1207; defacing a firearm under section 28-1208; unlawful discharge of a firearm under section 28-1212.02; possession, receipt, retention, or disposition of a stolen firearm under section 28-1212.03; unlawful possession of explosive materials in the first degree under section 28-1215; unlawful possession of explosive materials in the second degree under section 28-1216; unlawful sale of explosives under section 28-1217; use of explosives without a permit under section 28-1218; obtaining an explosives permit through false representations under section 28-1219; possession of a destructive device under section 28-1220; threatening the use of explosives or placing a false bomb under section 28-1221; using explosives to commit a felony under section 28-1222; using explosives to damage or destroy property under section 28-1223; and using explosives to kill or injure any person under section 28-1224;

(h) Any violation of the Securities Act of Nebraska pursuant to section 8-1117;

(i) Any violation of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 pursuant to section 77-2713;

(j) Offenses relating to public health and morals which include: Prostitution under section 28-801; pandering under section 28-802; keeping a place of prostitution under section 28-804; labor trafficking, sex trafficking, labor trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a minor under section 28-831; a violation of section 28-1005; and any act relating to the visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct prohibited in the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act; and

(k) A violation of the Computer Crimes Act;

(6) State means the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and

(7) Unlawful debt means a debt of at least one thousand five hundred dollars:

(a) Incurred or contracted in gambling activity which was in violation of federal law or the law of the state or which is unenforceable under state or federal law in whole or in part as to principal or interest because of the laws relating to usury; or

(b) Which was incurred in connection with the business of gambling in violation of federal law or the law of the state or the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate usurious under state law if the usurious rate is at least twice the enforceable rate.

Laws 2009, LB155, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB771, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB255, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 277;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 24;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB990, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB795, § 3.
July 18, 2026
Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act, see section 28-1801.

Computer Crimes Act, see section 28-1341.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.